Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The position of Veteran Volunteer Coordinator is created in the  Department
of Veterans’ Affairs. The responsibilities of  the coordinator include, but are not limited to,
all of the following:
(1) Developing and establishing a statewide Veterans Volunteer  Program and establishing
policies and procedures for the program;
(2) Developing and implementing a training program and training materials for the pro-
gram;
(3) Managing volunteer recruitment and screening and coordinating the services  of the
veteran volunteers;
(4) Creating electronic records, including but not limited to, records that track  volunteer
activities and veterans who have been contacted by volunteers; and
(5) Educating and coordinating volunteers and partners, including but not limited to care
facilities, veterans’ service officers, the Department of Human Services,  offices of the Aging
and Disability Resource Connection and others regarding  the needs of aging veterans and the
needs of the veteran volunteers.
SECTION 2. No later than September 15,  2020, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall
prepare and submit a report to  the standing and interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly that have authority  over the subject area of veterans’ affairs regarding the imple-
mentation and status of  the position of Veteran Volunteer Coordinator and the Veterans
Volunteer Program. The report shall include, at a minimum, information regarding  the fol-
lowing:
(1) The impact of the program on veterans served;
(2) The type of assistance provided by the coordinator and veteran volunteers;
(3) Data on volunteer activities and volunteer hours;
(4) Recommendations for the improvement  and expansion of the services provided by the
coordinator; and
(5) Recommendations for legislation.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $245,509
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the veterans’ services fund created under
section 4f, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution, to the Department  of Veterans’ Affairs
Enrolled House Bill 2908 (HB 2908-A) Page 1
for the  purpose of implementing and administering the position of Veteran Volunteer Coor-
dinator created under section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 26, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2908 (HB 2908-A) Page 2